District of Columbia statutes.
47-4651

Central Union Mission; Lots 825, 826, 830, and 831, Square 2895.

(a)

(1)

The real property, described as Lots 825, 826, 830, and 831, Square 2895 (“Property”) which is owned by Central Union Mission, Inc., a District of Columbia nonprofit corporation, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 8 of this title so long as the Property continues to be so owned by Central Union Mission, Inc., and the Property is not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009 as if the exemption were granted administratively.

(2)

Paragraph (1) shall apply to Lots 825 and 826, Square 2895, as of November 1, 2006 and to Lots 830 and 831, Square 2895, as of August 1, 2007.

(b)

The transfer of the Property, or any portion thereof, by the Central Union Mission, Inc., shall be exempt from the tax imposed by § 47-903.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 796(b), 58 DCR 1008
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 47-4651, see § 796(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
Short title: Section 795 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided that subtitle K of title VII of the act may be cited as “Central Union Mission Real Property Tax Exemption and Equitable Tax Relief Act of 2010”.